Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 10
FUNDING DEFICIENCIES

31-25-1001 to 31-25-1004. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire part repealed, p. 1062, § 39, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 10 was added in 1981 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1986. For the text of this part 10 prior to 1986, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.